Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 4. Bond Anticipation Notes

§ 16-5-401.
Short title.

This act [§§

16-5-401

through

16-5-412

] shall be known and may be cited as the “Bond Anticipation Note Act of 1981”.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1701; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-402.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

16-5-401

through

16-5-412

]:

“Anticipation note” means notes of the issuer, evidencing short-term borrowings, issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds which a governing body is authorized to issue;

“Authorizing instrument” means an ordinance, resolution, instrument or other written evidence of a proceeding by which a governing body takes formal action and adopts legislative provisions on matters of some permanency;

“Bonds” means general obligation bonds or revenue bonds of an issuer;

“General obligation bonds” means bonds authorized to be issued by a governing body or any successor thereto which are payable or which may be paid from ad valorem taxes or which constitute a debt or an indebtedness of the issuer within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation, which mature one (1) or more years after the date of their issuance and delivery;

“Governing body” means the city council, town council, commission, board of commissioners, board of trustees, board of directors or other legislative body of an issuer in which the legislative powers of the issuer are vested;

“Issuer” means any Wyoming county, school district, municipal corporation, community college, hospital district, sanitary and improvement district, water district, sewer district, water and sewer district, county improvement and service district or other political subdivision of the state specifically authorized by law to issue any general obligation bond or revenue bond;

“Revenue bond” means bonds authorized to be issued by a governing body or any successor thereto which are payable from a pledge of designated revenues other than ad valorem taxes or special assessments which mature one (1) or more years after the date of their issuance.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1702; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 16-5-403.
Authority to issue notes; election thereon.

If the qualified electors of an issuer authorize the issuance of bonds or the issuance of anticipation notes at an election held pursuant to W.S.

22-21-101

through

22-21-112

and the governing body of the issuer considers it advisable and in the interests of the issuer, to anticipate the issuance of the bonds, the governing body may from time to time and pursuant to an appropriate authorizing instrument issue its bond anticipation notes.

At the election to authorize the issuance of bond anticipation notes, the question shall state the maximum principal amount for which the notes may be issued, which may not exceed the principal amount of the bonds authorized, and the maximum rate of interest that may be paid on the notes.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1703; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to public body refunding securities, see art. 1 of this chapter.

As to state refunding bonds, see §

9-4-901

et seq.

As to funding and refunding bonds in cities and towns, see chapter 8 of title 15.

§ 16-5-404.
Authorizing instrument.

Anticipation notes issued pursuant to this act [§§

16-5-401

through

16-5-412

] shall be authorized by instrument of the issuer which shall:

Describe the bonds in anticipation of which the notes are to be issued;

Declare the results of the election authorizing the issuance of the bonds wherein the qualified electors of the issuer have approved their issuance in the manner required by law;

Specify the principal amount of the anticipation notes, the rate of interest and maturity date or dates of the anticipation notes, which maturity date or dates shall not exceed three (3) years from the date of issue of the anticipation notes.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1704; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 16-5-405.
Manner of issuance; form, terms and conditions.

Anticipation notes shall be issued and sold in such manner and at such price as the governing body determines by the instrument authorizing their issuance. Anticipation notes shall be in bearer form, except that the governing body may provide for the registration of the anticipation notes in the name of the owner either as to principal alone, or as to both principal and interest, and on such other terms and conditions as the governing body determines in the authorizing instrument. Interest on anticipation notes, not to exceed the rate authorized by the electors, may be payable semiannually, annually or at maturity. Anticipation notes may be made redeemable prior to maturity at the option of the governing body in the manner and upon the terms fixed by the instrument authorizing their issuance. Anticipation notes shall be executed and shall be in such form and have such details and terms as provided in the authorizing instrument.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1705; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-406.
Payment, surrender and cancellation.

Contemporaneously with the issuance of the bonds in anticipation of which anticipation notes have been issued, all anticipation notes issued, even though they may not then have matured, shall be paid, both as to principal and interest to date of payment, and all such notes shall be surrendered and cancelled by the issuer.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1706; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-407.
Security; sources of payment.

Whenever the bonds in anticipation of which notes are issued are to be payable from ad valorem taxes and constitute full general obligations of the municipality, the bond anticipation notes and the interest on them shall be secured by a pledge of the full faith and credit of the municipality in the manner provided in the statutes of the state authorizing their issuance and shall also be made payable from funds derived from the sale of the bonds in anticipation of which the notes are issued.

Whenever the bonds in anticipation of which the anticipation notes are to be issued are to be payable solely from revenues pledged for payment of revenue bonds, as provided in the statutes authorizing their issuance, such anticipation notes and the interest on them shall be secured by a pledge of the income and revenues pledged for payment of the revenue bonds and shall also be made payable from funds derived from the sale of the revenue bonds in anticipation of which the notes are issued.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1707; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-408.
Signing, countersigning, execution or attestation of notes; facsimile seals and signatures.

Any anticipation notes or interest coupon may be signed, countersigned, executed or attested by the public official or officials who are authorized by law at the time of the issuance of the anticipation notes to sign, countersign, execute or attest bonds or interest coupons of the issuer of the same general character as those bonds in anticipation of which the notes are being issued. In the alternative, the governing body may designate appropriate public officials to sign, countersign, execute or attest any anticipation note or appurtenant coupon, if any. Any officer so authorized or designated may utilize a facsimile signature in lieu of his manual signature in the manner provided by law, provided that compliance with any law other than this act [§§

16-5-401

through

16-5-412

] is not a condition of execution with a facsimile signature of any interest coupon. The facsimile seal shall have the same legal effect as the impression of the seal. Anticipation notes and any coupons bearing the signatures of officers in office on the date of the signing thereof shall be valid and binding obligations of the issuer, notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor any or all persons whose signatures appear thereon have ceased to fill their respective offices. Any officer of the issuer authorized or designated to sign, countersign, execute or attest any anticipation note or interest coupon, at the time of its execution or of the execution of a signature certificate, may adopt as and for his or her facsimile signature the facsimile signature of his or her predecessor in office in the event that such facsimile signature appears upon the anticipation note or coupons appertaining thereto, or upon both the anticipation notes and such coupons, after their delivery for value.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1708; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to facsimile seals and signatures of public officials, see chapter 2 of this title.

§ 16-5-409.
Recital in notes imparting legality.

Any instrument of an issuer authorizing, or any other instrument appertaining to, any anticipation note may provide that each anticipation note therein authorized shall recite that it is issued under the authority of this act [§§

16-5-401

through

16-5-412

]. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all of the provisions hereof, and all anticipation notes issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1709; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-410.
Endorsement.

The clerk of the issuer shall endorse a certificate upon every anticipation note that the same is issued pursuant to law and is within the debt limit of the issuer if the notes are issued in anticipation of the issuance of general obligation bonds, or, as to notes issued in anticipation of revenue bonds, that they do not constitute a debt of the issuer within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1710; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-411.
Governing body's determination of legality.

The determination of a governing body that all the limitations imposed upon the issuance of anticipation notes have been met shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud or arbitrary and gross abuse of discretion.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1711; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-412.
Scope, authority and effect of provisions.

This act [§§

16-5-401

through

16-5-412

], without reference to other statutes of the state except as herein otherwise specifically provided, constitutes full authority for the authorization and issuance of anticipation notes hereunder. No other act or law with regard to the authorization or issuance of securities by any issuer that in any way impedes or restricts the carrying out of the acts herein authorized to be done shall be construed as applying to any proceedings taken hereunder or acts done pursuant hereto, except as otherwise expressly provided herein. The powers conferred by this act shall be in addition to and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this act shall not affect the powers conferred by any other law applicable to any issuer except as otherwise provided herein.

Anticipation notes issued by the University of Wyoming shall be governed by W.S.

21-17-402

through

21-17-450

, the University Securities Law.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 62, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1712; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.